Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-130 of Title 37A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this section:
1. "Employee" means any person paid by an establishment
licensed by the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement (ABLE)
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1367 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Comm ission to sell, serve, dispense, or deliver alcoholic beverages
or to immediately manage, direct, supervise, or control the sale or
service of alcoholic beverages; and
2. "Seller-server training certificate" means a certificate
granted for completing an Oklahoma seller-server certification
course recognized by the ABLE Commission.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-130.1 of Title 37A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Certain actions of an employee are not attributable to
an establishment licensed by the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement
(ABLE) Commission and shall be an affirmative defense to such
liability when such licensed establishment receives a notice of
violation for certain actions of an employee.
B. The following actions of an employee of a licensed
establishment are not attributable to the licensed establishment:
1. The selling, furnishing, or giving of an alcoholic beverage
to:
a. a person who is insane or mentally deficient,
b. a minor, or
c. an intoxicated person; or
2. Allowing the consumption of an alcoholic beverage by:
a. a person who is insane or mentally deficient,
b. a minor, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1367 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. an intoxicated person.
C. A licensed establishment may assert the affirmative defense
if the license establishment:
1. Required all employees to maintain a currently valid
employee license from the ABLE Commission;
2. Required each employee to present a seller-server training
certificate within fourteen (14) days of his or her initial
employment date, unless the employee is deemed exempt by an existing
statute and require each employee to attend a seller-server training
course every two (2) years upon renewal of the employee license and
attend a seller-server training course every two (2) years after the
initial employment date, unless an employee is exempt pursuant to
Section 2-121 of Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Adopted written policies and procedures which prohibit:
a. the sale, service, dispensation, or delivery of an
alcoholic beverage to:
(1) a person who is insane or mentally deficient,
(2) a minor, or
(3) an intoxicated person, or
b. the employee from allowing consumption of an alcoholic
beverage by:
(1) a person who is insane or mentally deficient,
(2) a minor, or
(3) an intoxicated person; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1367 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Ensured that all employees have read and understood the
required policies as provided in paragraph 3 of this subsection by
having an acknowledgment of understanding by the employee in
writing. Such acknowledgment shall be kept for record by the
licensed establishment for at least one (1) year after the date the
employee was terminated.
D. A licensed establishment asserting the affirmative defense
under this act shall provide to the ABLE Commission, not later than
ten (10) days after receipt of an administrative notice of
violation, an affidavit indicating that the licensed establishment
was in compliance with the requirements of this act at the time of
the violation for which the administrative notice was issued, which
shall include a copy of the valid employee license held by the
employee who committed the alleged violation, a copy of the current
training certificate held by that employee, and a signed copy of
acknowledgment of receipt of policies by the employee. At a hearing
in which the licensed establishment asserts the affirmative defense
crated by this act, the licensed establishment may be required to
present additional evidence to support such defense.
E. When an employee does not possess a currently valid employee
license from the ABLE Commission, the action of the employee shall
be attributable to the licensed establishment.
F. Proof by the ABLE Commission that an employee performed an
action described in this act on three or more occasions within a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1367 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

twel ve-month period shall create a rebuttable presumption that a
licensed establishment has indirectly encouraged a violation of the
law pursuant to this act. The rebuttable presumption is created
regardless of whether the employee performing the action described
in this subsection on a second or subsequent occasion is the same
employee who performed the initial action. Proof of violation shall
be demonstrated by:
1. Producing final orders issued by the ABLE Commission or a
court of competent jurisdiction finding that the licensed
establishment violated this act on two past occasions; and
2. Establishing a prima facie case that an employee of the
licensed establishment violated this act on a third or subsequent
occasion.
G. Proof of violation of this act shall be for the same type of
offense and shall have occurred within a twelve-month period, as
calculated from the dates the incidents occurred.
H. At a hearing in which the licensed establishment asserts the
affirmative defense established in this act, the ABLE Commission may
present evidence to establish a rebuttable presumption under this
act. If the evidence is sufficient to establish a prima facie case,
the burden of persuasion in the proceeding shifts to the licensed
establishment to show that it has not indirectly encouraged a
violation of the law within the meaning of this act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1367 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

I. Nothing in this act shall be construed to establish
exclusive means by which the ABLE Commission may establish that a
licensed establishment has indirectly encouraged a violation of this
act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
April 17, 2025 - DO PASS


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1367 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)